Vermont, session 2025-2026, S300.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4755 is added to read:
§ 4755. FENTANYL; URINE DRUG SCREENING
(a) If a patient is treated in a hospital licensed pursuant to chapter 43 of this
title and the hospital conducts a urine drug screening to assist in diagnosing the
patient’s condition, the hospital shall include testing for fentanyl as part of the
urine drug screening.
(b)(1) A hospital conducting a urine drug screening pursuant to this section
and its employees shall not disclose the screening results for fentanyl to a law
VT LEG #378306 v.4

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.300
2026 Page 2 of 2
enforcement officer, unless the screening result is sought pursuant to a valid
warrant or subpoena.
(2) A hospital and its employees shall be immune from civil and
criminal liability for disclosing the screening results to a law enforcement
officer in good faith reliance on the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
(c) As used in this section, “urine drug screening” means a chemical
analysis intended to test patients for the presence of multiple drugs, including
cocaine, opioids, and phencyclidine.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378306 v.4